Wyoming, session 2025, HB0314.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) During the 2025 interim, the joint corporations,
elections and political subdivisions interim committee
shall study issues surrounding the use of the power of
eminent domain in the state. As part of the study, the
committee shall consider the following issues at a minimum:

HB0314

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0725
(i) Adequate compensation for the taking of
property through the use of eminent domain;

(ii) Reclamation and restoration of property
after an easement is released;

(iii) Liability for damages caused by the
utilization of property acquired through eminent domain;

(iv) Reasons the power of eminent domain can be
used;

(v) Parties authorized to use the power of
eminent domain;

(vi) Abandonment of easements acquired through
eminent domain; and

(vii) Types of land that can be acquired through
eminent domain.

(b) Based upon the study required by subsection (a)
of this section, the joint corporations, elections and
HB0314

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0725
political subdivisions interim committee shall prepare any
recommended legislation for consideration during the 2026
budget session.

Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0314